Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB333.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 16.220 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the duty to return confiscated firearms to innocent owners pursuant to
KRS 500.090, all firearms confiscated by the Department of Kentucky State Police
and not retained for official use pursuant to KRS 500.090 shall be sold at public
auction to:
(a) Federally licensed firearms dealers holding a license appropriate for the type
of firearm sold; or
(b) For a firearm which was used in a homicide, any person who certifies on a
form provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police prior to placing a
bid that he or she will, upon completion of the auction, leave the firearm with
the Department of Kentucky State Police for destruction. A state or local
government or agency thereof shall not purchase a firearm under this
paragraph.
(2) Any provision of KRS Chapter 45 or 45A relating to disposition of property to the
contrary notwithstanding, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall:
(a) Conduct any auction specified by this section;
(b) Retain for departmental use twenty percent (20%) of the gross proceeds from
any auction specified by this section;
(c) Transfer remaining proceeds of the sale to the account of the Kentucky Office
of the Attorney General[Homeland Security] for use as provided in
subsection (5) of this section; and
(d) For any sale pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, destroy the firearm.
(3) Prior to the sale of any firearm, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall
make an attempt to determine if the firearm to be sold has been stolen or otherwise
unlawfully obtained from an innocent owner and return the firearm to its lawful
Page 1 of 5
SB033310.100 - 861 - XXXX 3/13/2026 10:03 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 333/GA
innocent owner, unless that person is ineligible to purchase a firearm under federal
law.
(4) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall receive firearms and ammunition
confiscated by or abandoned to every law enforcement agency in Kentucky. The
department shall dispose of the firearms received in the manner specified in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section. However, firearms which are not retained for
official use, returned to an innocent lawful owner, or transferred to another
government agency or public museum shall be sold as provided in subsection (1) of
this section.
(5) (a) The proceeds of firearms sales shall be utilized by the [Kentucky ]Office of
the Attorney General[Homeland Security] to provide grants to:
1. City, county, charter county, unified local government, urban-county
government, and consolidated local government police departments;
2. University safety and security departments organized pursuant to KRS
164.950;
3. School districts that employ special law enforcement officers as defined
in KRS 61.900;
4. Airport safety and security departments established under KRS 183.880;
and
5. Sheriff's departments;
for the purchase of [:
(a) ]body armor for sworn peace officers of those departments and service
animals, as defined in KRS 525.010, of those departments[;
(b) Firearms or ammunition;
(c) Electronic control devices, electronic control weapons, or electro-muscular
disruption technology; and
(d) Body-worn cameras].
Page 2 of 5
SB033310.100 - 861 - XXXX 3/13/2026 10:03 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 333/GA
(b) [In awarding grants under this section, the Kentucky Office of Homeland
Security shall give first priority to providing and replacing body armor and
second priority to providing firearms and ammunition, with residual funds
available for the purchase of body-worn cameras, electronic control devices,
electronic control weapons, or electro-muscular disruption technology. ]Body
armor purchased by the department receiving grant funds shall meet or exceed
the standards issued by the National Institute of Justice for body armor. A[No]
police or sheriff's department shall not apply for a grant to replace existing
body armor unless that body armor has been in actual use for a period of five
(5) years or longer.[ Any department applying for grant funds for body-worn
cameras shall develop a policy for their use and shall submit that policy with
its application for the grant funds to the Office of Homeland Security as part
of the application process.]
(6) The Department of Kentucky State Police may transfer a machine gun, short-
barreled shotgun, short-barreled rifle, silencer, pistol with a shoulder stock, any
other weapon, or destructive device as defined by the National Firearms Act which
is subject to registration under the National Firearms Act and is not properly
registered in the national firearms transfer records for those types of weapons, to the
Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, [and ]Firearms and Explosives of the United States
Department of Justice, after a reasonable attempt has been made to transfer the
firearm to an eligible state or local law enforcement agency or to an eligible
museum and no eligible recipient will take the firearm or weapon. National
Firearms Act firearms and weapons which are properly registered and not returned
to an innocent lawful owner or retained for official use as provided in this section
shall be sold in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
Section 2. KRS 147A.002 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department for Local Government shall be headed by a commissioner and
Page 3 of 5
SB033310.100 - 861 - XXXX 3/13/2026 10:03 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 333/GA
shall consist of the:
(a) Office of Financial Management and Administration, which shall be headed
by an executive director appointed by the commissioner and shall be
responsible for duties including but not limited to local government financial
assistance; county budget approval; performance of various recordkeeping
requirements for the Commonwealth's cities, counties, and special districts;
provision of administrative support for the state local debt officer and the state
local finance officer; administration of the county officials training incentive
program set forth in KRS 64.5275; and provision of financial analysis and
guidance related to the internal budgetary processes of the Department for
Local Government;
(b) Office of Federal Grants, which shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the commissioner and shall be responsible for the administration
of all federal grant programs;
(c) Office of State Grants, which shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the commissioner and shall be responsible for the administration
of all state grant programs, including the Renaissance on Main Program, the
area development fund,[ the body armor program set forth in KRS 16.220,]
the cemetery fund program, single county coal severance grants, and any state
grant programs or individually funded projects awarded by statute or budget;
(d) Office of Legal Services, which shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the commissioner and shall be responsible for legal services
within the Department for Local Government and for its constituencies around
the Commonwealth; and
(e) Office of Field Services, which shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the commissioner and shall be responsible for duties including
but not limited to staffing regional offices to assist local governments.
Page 4 of 5
SB033310.100 - 861 - XXXX 3/13/2026 10:03 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 333/GA
(2) The commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, shall appoint necessary
deputies, assistants, attorneys, and other employees and shall fix their compensation
and authorize payment of their expenses according to law.
Page 5 of 5
SB033310.100 - 861 - XXXX 3/13/2026 10:03 AM GA